Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DECOMMISSIONING AND REPURPOSING PLAN FOR COAL-FIRED PLANT.new text end new text begin (a) As a part of the next resource plan filing under Minnesota Statutes, section 216B.2422, subdivision 2, but no later than February 1, 2027, a public utility that owns an electric generation facility that is powered by coal, scheduled for retirement in 2027 and 2031, and located within the Mississippi River - St. Cloud Watershed must provide, to the extent known, the public utility's plan to repurpose each unit. new text end new text begin (b) A public utility that is subject to paragraph (a) must provide a copy of the plan and timeline to the governing body of the municipality where the electric generation facility is located on the same date the plan and timeline is submitted to the Public Utilities Commission. new text end new text begin (c) If a resource plan is not filed or required before February 1, 2027, the plan and timeline must be submitted to the Public Utilities Commission and the municipality as a separate filing by February 1, 2027. new text end